Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:(1) Each community and technical college may waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and activity fees for tribal elders over the age of 55 from eligible Indian tribes as defined in RCW 43.376.010.(2) The state board for community and technical colleges may adopt and amend as necessary rules to implement this section.--- END ---